Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0573.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 51. (1) For receiving, earning, or otherwise acquiring
income from any source whatsoever, there is levied and imposed
under this part upon the taxable income of every person other than
a corporation a tax at the following rates in the following
circumstances:
(a) On and after October 1, 2007 and before October 1, 2012,
4.35%.
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


(b) Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (c), on and
after October 1, 2012, 4.25%.
(c) For each tax year beginning on and after January 1, 2023,
if the percentage increase in the total general fund/general
purpose revenue from the immediately preceding fiscal year is
greater than the inflation rate for the same period and the
inflation rate is positive, then the current rate shall must be
reduced by an amount determined by multiplying that rate by a
fraction, the numerator of which is the difference between the
total general fund/general purpose revenue from the immediately
preceding state fiscal year and the capped general fund/general
purpose revenue and the denominator of which is the total revenue
collected from this part in the immediately preceding state fiscal
year. For purposes of this subdivision only, the state treasurer,
the director of the senate fiscal agency, and the director of the
house fiscal agency shall determine whether the total revenue
distributed to general fund/general purpose revenue has increased
as required under this subdivision based on the comprehensive
annual financial report prepared and published by the department of
technology, management, and budget in accordance with section 23 of
article IX of the state constitution of 1963. The state treasurer,
the director of the senate fiscal agency, and the director of the
house fiscal agency shall make the determination under this
subdivision no later than the date of the January 2023 revenue
estimating conference conducted pursuant to sections 367a through
367f of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1367a to
18.1367f, and the date of each January revenue estimating
conference conducted each year thereafter. As used in this
subdivision:
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


(i) "Capped general fund/general purpose revenue" means the
total general fund/general purpose revenue from the 2020-2021 state
fiscal year multiplied by the sum of 1 plus the product of 1.425
times the difference between a fraction, the numerator of which is
the Consumer Price Index for the state fiscal year ending in the
tax year prior to the tax year for which the adjustment is being
made and the denominator of which is the Consumer Price Index for
the 2020-2021 state fiscal year, and 1.
(ii) "Total general fund/general purpose revenue" means the
total general fund/general purpose revenue and other financing
sources as published in the comprehensive annual financial report
schedule of revenue and other financing sources – general fund for
that fiscal year plus any distribution made pursuant to former
section 51d or section 51a(d).
(2) Except as otherwise provided for December 1, 2018 through
September 30, 2019, beginning January 1, 2000 through September 30,
2023, that percentage of the gross collections before refunds from
the tax levied under this section that is equal to 1.012% divided
by the income tax rate levied under this section shall be deposited
in the state school aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of
the state constitution of 1963. For December 1, 2018 through
September 30, 2019 only, that percentage of the gross collections
before refunds from the tax levied under this section that is equal
to 0.954% divided by the income tax rate levied under this section
shall be deposited in the state school aid fund created in section
11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. For October 1,
2023 through September 30, 2024 only, that percentage of the gross
collections before refunds from the tax levied under this section
that is equal to 1.015% divided by the income tax rate levied under
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


this section shall be deposited in the state school aid fund
created in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of
1963. For October 1, 2024 through September 30, 2025 only, that
percentage of the gross collections before refunds from the tax
levied under this section that is equal to 1.023% divided by the
income tax rate levied under this section shall be deposited in the
state school aid fund created in section 11 of article IX of the
state constitution of 1963. For October 1, 2025 through September
30, 2026 only, that percentage of the gross collections before
refunds from the tax levied under this section that is equal to
1.033% divided by the income tax rate levied under this section
shall be deposited in the state school aid fund created in section
11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. Beginning
October 1, 2026, that percentage of the gross collections before
refunds from the tax levied under this section that is equal to
1.040% divided by the income tax rate levied under this section
shall be deposited in the state school aid fund created in section
11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963.
(3) In addition to the distributions under subsections (2) and
(4) and sections 51d, 51e, and 51f, beginning October 1, 2016, from
the revenue collected under this section an amount equal to 3.5% of
the average amount of farmland tax credits claimed under section
36109 of the natural resources and environmental protection act,
1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36109, for the immediately preceding 3 state
fiscal years shall be deposited into the agricultural preservation
fund created in section 36202 of the natural resources and
environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36202.
(4) In addition to the distributions under subsections (2) and
(3) and sections 51d, 51e, and 51f, and subject to the limitation
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


under this subsection, beginning with the 2018-2019 state fiscal
year and each fiscal year thereafter, from the revenue collected
under this section $69,000,000.00 shall be deposited into the renew
Michigan fund created in section 51g. However, if, in any 1 of the
2018-2019 through the 2021-2022 state fiscal years, the minimum
foundation allowance falls below the 2017-2018 minimum foundation
allowance established under section 20 of the state school aid act
of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1620, as amended by 2017 PA 108, then
no money shall be deposited into the renew Michigan fund pursuant
to this subsection for that fiscal year.
(2) (5) The department shall annualize rates provided in
subsection (1) as necessary. The applicable annualized rate shall
be is imposed upon the taxable income of every person other than a
corporation for those tax years.
(3) (6) The taxable income of a nonresident shall must be
computed in the same manner that the taxable income of a resident
is computed, subject to the allocation and apportionment provisions
of this part.
(4) (7) A resident beneficiary of a trust whose taxable income
includes all or part of an accumulation distribution by a trust, as
defined in section 665 of the internal revenue code, shall be is
allowed a credit against the tax otherwise due under this part. The
credit shall must be all or a proportionate part of any tax paid by
the trust under this part for any preceding taxable year that would
not have been payable if the trust had in fact made distribution to
its beneficiaries at the times and in the amounts specified in
section 666 of the internal revenue code. The credit shall does not
reduce the tax otherwise due from the beneficiary to an amount less
than would have been due if the accumulation distribution were
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


excluded from taxable income.
(5) (8) The taxable income of a resident who is required to
include income from a trust in the resident's federal income tax
return under the provisions of 26 USC 671 to 679, shall include
includes items of income and deductions from the trust in taxable
income to the extent required by this part with respect to property
owned outright.
(6) (9) It is the intention of this section that the income
subject to tax of every person other than corporations shall must
be computed in like manner and be the same as provided in the
internal revenue code subject to adjustments specifically provided
for in this part.
(7) (10) As used in this section:
(a) "Consumer Price Index" means the United States Consumer
Price Index for all urban consumers as defined and reported by the
United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(b) "Inflation rate" means the annual percentage change in the
Consumer Price Index, as determined by the department, comparing
the 2 most recent completed state fiscal years.
(c) "Person other than a corporation" means a resident or
nonresident individual or any of the following:
(i) A partner in a partnership as defined in the internal
revenue code.
(ii) A beneficiary of an estate or a trust as defined in the
internal revenue code.
(iii) An estate or trust as defined in the internal revenue
code.
(d) "Taxable income" means taxable income as defined in this
part subject to the applicable source and attribution rules
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


contained in this part.
Sec. 51a. Except as otherwise provided under this section,
beginning October 1, 2025, the following amounts of revenue
collected from the tax levied under section 51 must be deposited in
the following manner:
(a) For October 1, 2025 through September 30, 2026 only, that
percentage of the gross collections before refunds from the tax
levied under section 51 that is equal to 1.033% divided by the
income tax rate levied under section 51 to the state school aid
fund created in section 11 of article IX of the state constitution
of 1963. Beginning October 1, 2026, that percentage of the gross
collections before refunds from the tax levied under section 51
that is equal to 1.040% divided by the income tax rate levied under
section 51 to the state school aid fund created in section 11 of
article IX of the state constitution of 1963.
(b) An amount equal to 3.5% of the average amount of farmland
tax credits claimed under section 36109 of the natural resources
and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36109, for
the immediately preceding 3 state fiscal years to the agricultural
preservation fund created in section 36202 of the natural resources
and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.36202.
(c) $69,000,000.00 to the renew Michigan fund created in
section 51g.
(d) $600,000.00 to the Michigan transportation fund created in
section 10 of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660, and disbursed as provided in
section 10(1)(l) of 1951 PA 51, MCL 247.660.
(e) An amount equal to the construction period tax capture
revenues, withholding tax capture revenues, and income tax capture
revenues due to be transmitted under all transformational
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


brownfield plans adopted under the brownfield redevelopment
financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670, to the state
brownfield redevelopment fund created in section 8a of the
brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2658a.
As used in this subdivision, "construction period tax capture
revenues", "income tax capture revenues", and "withholding tax
capture revenues" mean those terms as defined in section 2 of the
brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2652.
(f) An amount equal to that portion of the withholding tax
capture revenues attributable to certified new jobs and due to be
paid to an authorized business pursuant to a written agreement
entered into under chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act,
1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j, to the good jobs for
Michigan fund created in section 90j of the Michigan strategic fund
act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090j. As used in this subdivision,
"authorized business", "certified new jobs", "withholding tax
capture revenues", and "written agreement" mean those terms as
defined in section 90g of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA
270, MCL 125.2090g.
Sec. 695. (1) Except as otherwise provided under this section,
the revenue collected under this part shall be distributed to the
general fund. If the amendatory act that added section 51h takes
effect before April 18, 2023, then for the 2021-2022 state fiscal
year only, from the tax levied under this part, $800,000,000.00 of
the revenue collected is appropriated and must be deposited into
the state treasury to the credit of the Michigan taxpayer rebate
fund created in section 51h, and the balance of the revenue
collected under this part for that state fiscal year shall be
deposited to the general fund.
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


(2) Beginning with the 2022-2023 state fiscal year through the
2024-2025 state fiscal year, from the tax levied under this part,
the revenue collected under this part shall be deposited in the
following manner:
(a) Up to $1,200,000,000.00 to the general fund.
(b) After the deposit under subdivision (a), up to
$50,000,000.00, if available, to the Michigan housing and community
development fund created in section 58a of the state housing
development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1458a.
(c) After the deposits under subdivisions (a) and (b), up to
$50,000,000.00, if available, to the revitalization and placemaking
fund created in section 696.
(d) After the deposits under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c),
up to $500,000,000.00, if available, to the strategic outreach and
attraction reserve fund created in section 4 of the Michigan trust
fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.254.
(e) The balance of any revenue collected under this part after
the deposits under subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), to the
general fund.
(3) Beginning with the 2025-2026 state fiscal year, from the
tax levied under this part, $50,000,000.00 of the revenue collected
under this part shall must be deposited to the Michigan housing and
community development fund created in section 58a of the state
housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL
125.1458a, and the balance of the revenue collected under this part
for that state fiscal year shall must be deposited to the general
fund.
Enacting section 1. Sections 51d to 51f, 51h, and 476 of the
income tax act of 1967, 1967 PA 281, MCL 206.51d to 206.51f,
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3


206.51h, and 206.476, are repealed.
Final Page
KAS S04918'25 (S-2) 5v2if3